Vermont, session 2025-2026, S83.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. § 41a is amended to read:
§ 41a. LEGAL RATES
VT LEG #378803 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.83
2025 Page 2 of 4
(a) Except as specifically provided by law, the rate of interest or the sum
allowed for forbearance or use of money shall be 12 percent per annum
computed by the actuarial method.
(b) The rate of interest or the sum allowed:
* * *
(10)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (10),
for medical debt, the interest shall be limited to the rate of interest equal to the
weekly average one-year constant maturity Treasury yield, but not less than 1.5
percent per annum nor more than four percent per annum, as published by the
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System for the calendar week
preceding the date on which the consumer was first provided with a bill.
(B) A patient receiving financial assistance pursuant to 18 V.S.A.
chapter 221, subchapter 10 shall not be charged any interest or late fees on
medical debt.
(C) As used in this subdivision (10):
(i) “Medical debt” means a debt arising from the receipt of health
care services.
(ii) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis,
prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a physical, dental, behavioral, or mental
health condition or substance use disorder, including counseling, procedures,
products, devices, and medications.
VT LEG #378803 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.83
2025 Page 3 of 4
* * *
Sec. 2. 9 V.S.A. § 2466d is added to read:
§ 2466d. REPORTING OF MEDICAL DEBT INFORMATION
PROHIBITED
A credit reporting agency shall not report or maintain in the file on a
consumer information relating to a medical debt, as defined in 18 V.S.A.
§ 9481.
Sec. 3. 12 V.S.A. § 1044 is added to read:
§ 1044. LIMITATIONS ON ENFORCEMENT OF MEDICAL DEBT
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or rule to the contrary,
the court shall not order attachment of or execution or trustee process on any
person’s property or earnings in order to enforce a medical debt against the
person.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Medical debt” means a debt arising from the receipt of health care
services.
(2) “Health care services” means services for the diagnosis, prevention,
treatment, cure, or relief of a physical, dental, behavioral, or mental health
condition or substance use disorder, including counseling, procedures,
products, devices, and medications.
VT LEG #378803 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.83
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. chapter 221, subchapter 10 is amended to read:
Subchapter 10. Patient Financial Assistance and Medical Debt
* * *
§ 9485. PROHIBITION ON SALE OR REPORTING OF MEDICAL DEBT
(a) No large health care facility shall sell its medical debt.
(b) No large health care facility or medical debt collector shall report or
otherwise furnish any portion of a medical debt to a credit reporting agency.
* * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, provided that the limitations on
interest in Sec. 1 (9 V.S.A. § 41a) shall apply only to new medical debt
incurred on or after July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378803 v.1